California, session 20252026, SB893.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5011.4 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:5011.4. (a) For purposes of this section, “eligible Gold Star Family member” means a person who meets both of the following requirements:(1) The person is a resident of the state.(2) The person is eligible to receive a gold star lapel button pursuant to Section 1126 of Title 10 of the United States Code.(b) An eligible Gold Star Family member, upon presentation of proof to the department, shall be issued a pass entitling the bearer to the use of all facilities, including boat launching facilities, in units of the state park system.(c) The department shall adopt regulations, as necessary, for purposes of implementing this section.